West Virginia, session 2026, SB881.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. §49-2-121. Rule‑making. (a) The secretary shall promulgate legislative rules in accordance with §29A‑3‑1 et seq. of this code regarding the licensure, approval, certification, and registration of child care facilities and the implementation of this article. (b) The secretary shall review the rules promulgated pursuant to this article at least once every five years, making revisions when necessary or convenient.(c) The rules shall incorporate, by reference, the requirements of the Integrated Pest Management Program established by legislative rule by the Department of Agriculture under §19‑16A‑4 of this code.(d) The rules shall provide that the department reimburse licensed childcare providers based upon a child’s monthly enrollment so long as the child has attended the afterschool provider’s site for at least two and a half hours or more at least one day per month. (e) The rules shall provide a system for the electronic filing of all days of attendance billed by child care providers to the department. The department shall have the system in place no later than July 1, 2026, after which any child care provider seeking reimbursement from the department for child care services provided shall submit any and all supporting documents for the department’s review electronically.